Washington statutes.
RCW 41.37.030

Nonelective position—Eligible position, when.

Any person who has been employed in a nonelective position for at least nine months and who has made member contributions required under this chapter throughout such period, shall be deemed to have been in an eligible position during such period of employment.

[ 2004 c 242 s 6.]